test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verbs_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - myl - ok : # singular declensions for vyras
    myl+V+Pres+Sg1: myliu
    myl+V+Pres+Sg2: myli
    myl+V+Pres+Sg3: myli
    myl+V+Pres+Pl1: mylime
    myl+V+Pres+Pl2: mylite
    myl+V+Pres+Pl3: myli
    myl+V+Past+Sg1: mylėjau
    myl+V+Past+Sg2: mylėjai
    myl+V+Past+Sg3: mylėjo
    myl+V+Past+Pl1: mylėjome
    myl+V+Past+Pl2: mylėjote
    myl+V+Past+Pl3: mylėjo
